src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - C - makizin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     makizin+NI: makizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+makizin+NI: nimakizin
     2+makizin+NI: gimakizin
     3+makizin+NI: omakizin
     X+makizin+NI: imakizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     makizin+NI+Con: makizinenh
     makizin+NI+Dim: makizinens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     makizin+NI+Pej: makizinish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     makizin+NI+Prt: makiziniban
     makizin+NI+Voc+Pl: makizinidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     makizin+NI+4: makizinan
     makizin+NI+Loc: makizining
     makizin+NI+Pl: makizinan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+makizin+NI+Con: nimakizinenh
     1+makizin+NI+Dim: nimakizinens
     2+makizin+NI+Con: gimakizinenh
     2+makizin+NI+Dim: gimakizinens
     3+makizin+NI+Con: omakizinenh
     3+makizin+NI+Dim: omakizinens
     X+makizin+NI+Con: imakizinenh
     X+makizin+NI+Dim: imakizinens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+makizin+NI+Pos: nimakizinim
     2+makizin+NI+Pos: gimakizinim
     3+makizin+NI+Pos: omakizinim
     X+makizin+NI+Pos: imakizinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+makizin+NI+Pej: nimakizinish
     2+makizin+NI+Pej: gimakizinish
     3+makizin+NI+Pej: omakizinish
     X+makizin+NI+Pej: imakizinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl: nimakizininaan
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl: gimakizininaan
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl: gimakiziniwaa
     3+makizin+NI+3+4: omakizinini
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl: omakiziniwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Prt: nimakiziniban
     1+makizin+NI+Voc+Pl: nimakizinidin
     2+makizin+NI+Prt: gimakiziniban
     2+makizin+NI+Voc+Pl: gimakizinidin
     3+makizin+NI+Prt: omakiziniban
     3+makizin+NI+Voc+Pl: omakizinidin
     X+makizin+NI+Prt: imakiziniban
     X+makizin+NI+Voc+Pl: imakizinidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+makizin+NI+4: nimakizinan
     1+makizin+NI+Loc: nimakizining
     1+makizin+NI+Pl: nimakizinan
     2+makizin+NI+4: gimakizinan
     2+makizin+NI+Loc: gimakizining
     2+makizin+NI+Pl: gimakizinan
     3+makizin+NI+4: omakizinan
     3+makizin+NI+Loc: omakizining
     3+makizin+NI+Pl: omakizinan
     X+makizin+NI+4: imakizinan
     X+makizin+NI+Loc: imakizining
     X+makizin+NI+Pl: imakizinan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej: makizinenyish
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej: makizinensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     makizin+NI+Con+Prt: makizinenyiban
     makizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: makizinenyidin
     makizin+NI+Dim+Prt: makizinensiban
     makizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: makizinensidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     makizin+NI+Con+4: makizinenyin
     makizin+NI+Con+Loc: makizinenying
     makizin+NI+Con+Pl: makizinenyin
     makizin+NI+Dim+4: makizinensan
     makizin+NI+Dim+Loc: makizinensing
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pl: makizinensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     makizin+NI+Pej+Prt: makizinishiban
     makizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: makizinishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     makizin+NI+Pej+4: makizinishan
     makizin+NI+Pej+Loc: makizinishing
     makizin+NI+Pej+Pl: makizinishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     makizin+NI+Prt+4: makizinibaniin
     makizin+NI+Prt+Loc: makizinibaniing
     makizin+NI+Prt+Pl: makizinibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos: nimakizinenyim
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos: nimakizinensim
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos: gimakizinenyim
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos: gimakizinensim
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos: omakizinenyim
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos: omakizinensim
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos: imakizinenyim
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos: imakizinensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej: nimakizinenyish
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej: nimakizinensish
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej: gimakizinenyish
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej: gimakizinensish
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej: omakizinenyish
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej: omakizinensish
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pej: imakizinenyish
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej: imakizinensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl: nimakizinenyinaan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nimakizinensinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl: gimakizinenyinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl: gimakizinenyiwaa
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gimakizinensinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl: gimakizinensiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4: omakizinenyini
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl: omakizinenyiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4: omakizinensini
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl: omakizinensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Prt: nimakizinenyiban
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nimakizinenyidin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Prt: nimakizinensiban
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nimakizinensidin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Prt: gimakizinenyiban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyidin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Prt: gimakizinensiban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensidin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Prt: omakizinenyiban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyidin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Prt: omakizinensiban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: omakizinensidin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Prt: imakizinenyiban
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: imakizinenyidin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Prt: imakizinensiban
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: imakizinensidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+4: nimakizinenyin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Loc: nimakizinenying
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pl: nimakizinenyin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+4: nimakizinensan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Loc: nimakizinensing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pl: nimakizinensan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+4: gimakizinenyin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Loc: gimakizinenying
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pl: gimakizinenyin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+4: gimakizinensan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Loc: gimakizinensing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pl: gimakizinensan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+4: omakizinenyin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Loc: omakizinenying
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pl: omakizinenyin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+4: omakizinensan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Loc: omakizinensing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pl: omakizinensan
     X+makizin+NI+Con+4: imakizinenyin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Loc: imakizinenying
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pl: imakizinenyin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+4: imakizinensan
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Loc: imakizinensing
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pl: imakizinensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej: nimakizinimish
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej: gimakizinimish
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej: omakizinimish
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej: imakizinimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl: nimakiziniminaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl: gimakiziniminaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl: gimakizinimiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+4: omakizinimini
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl: omakizinimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt: nimakizinimiban
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: nimakizinimidin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt: gimakizinimiban
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: gimakizinimidin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt: omakizinimiban
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: omakizinimidin
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt: imakizinimiban
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: imakizinimidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+4: nimakiziniman
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Loc: nimakiziniming
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pl: nimakiziniman
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+4: gimakiziniman
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Loc: gimakiziniming
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pl: gimakiziniman
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+4: omakiziniman
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Loc: omakiziniming
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pl: omakiziniman
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+4: imakiziniman
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Loc: imakiziniming
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Pl: imakiziniman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nimakizinishinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gimakizinishinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl: gimakizinishiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4: omakizinishini
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl: omakizinishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt: nimakizinishiban
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimakizinishidin
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt: gimakizinishiban
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimakizinishidin
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt: omakizinishiban
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: omakizinishidin
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt: imakizinishiban
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: imakizinishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+4: nimakizinishan
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Loc: nimakizinishing
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Pl: nimakizinishan
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+4: gimakizinishan
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Loc: gimakizinishing
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Pl: gimakizinishan
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+4: omakizinishan
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Loc: omakizinishing
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Pl: omakizinishan
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+4: imakizinishan
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Loc: imakizinishing
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Pl: imakizinishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizininaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizininaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizininaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizininaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt: gimakiziniwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakiziniwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Prt: omakizininiiban
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizininiidin
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt: omakiziniwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakiziniwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+4: nimakizininaanin
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizininaaning
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizininaanig
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+4: gimakizininaanin
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizininaaning
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizininaanig
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+4: gimakiziniwaan
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Loc: gimakiziniwaang
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Pl: gimakiziniwaag
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+4: omakizininiwa
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Loc: omakizininiing
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Pl: omakizininiwa
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+4: omakiziniwaan
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Loc: omakiziniwaang
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Pl: omakiziniwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Prt+4: nimakizinibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Prt+Loc: nimakizinibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Prt+Pl: nimakizinibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Prt+4: gimakizinibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Prt+Loc: gimakizinibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Prt+Pl: gimakizinibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Prt+4: omakizinibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Prt+Loc: omakizinibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Prt+Pl: omakizinibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Prt+4: imakizinibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Prt+Loc: imakizinibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Prt+Pl: imakizinibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: makizinenyishiban
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: makizinenyishidin
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: makizinensishiban
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: makizinensishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: makizinenyishan
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makizinenyishing
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: makizinenyishan
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: makizinensishan
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: makizinensishing
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: makizinensishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     makizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: makizinenyibaniin
     makizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: makizinenyibaniing
